Vermont statutes. Title 22 Libraries, History, and Information Technology
Subchapter 2. Provisions Relating to Compact

§ 41.
Town participation restricted.

No town of this State may be a party to a library agreement which provides for the construction or maintenance of a library under Article III, subdivision (c-7) [section 23(c)7. of this title] of the compact, nor pledge its credit in support of such a library, or contribute to the capital financing thereof, except after compliance with any laws applicable to towns relating to or governing capital outlays and the pledging of credit.

HISTORY:

Added

1963, No. 119

, § 3, eff. May 28, 1963.

§ 42.
State library agency defined.

As used in the compact, “state library agency” with reference to this State, means, the department of libraries and any department of state government providing library services.

HISTORY:

Added

1963, No. 119

, § 4, eff. May 28, 1963.

§ 43.
Compact administrator, appointment.

The Governor shall appoint an officer of this State who shall be the compact administrator under Article X [section 30 of this title] of this compact.

HISTORY:

Added

1963, No. 119

, § 5, eff. May 28, 1963.

§ 44.
Withdrawal, notices.

In the event of withdrawal from the compact, the Governor shall send and receive any notices required by Article XI(b) [section 31(b) of this title] of the compact.

HISTORY:

Added

1963, No. 119

, § 6, eff. May 28, 1963.